New Jersey, session 222, A5258.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 17 of P.L.1993, c.65 (C.19:44A-11.2), or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, contributions received by a candidate, candidate committee, joint candidates committee, or legislative leadership committee may be used to pay for the reasonable costs of security measures for a candidate or officeholder, members of their family who reside in the same household, and staff, provided that the security measures address ongoing dangers or threats that would not otherwise exist were it not for the individuals status or duties as a candidate or officeholder. b.    Expenditures may be made to pay for the following security measures, provided that such expenditures are based on the fair market value of the goods and services: (1)  non-structural security devices, such as security hardware, locks, alarm systems, motion detectors, and security camera systems; (2)  structural security devices, such as wiring, lighting, gates, doors, and fencing, so long as such devices are intended solely to provide security 1[and not to improve the property or increase its value]1; (3)  security personnel and services that are bona fide, legitimate, and professional, and compliant with the Security Officer Registration Act, P.L.2004, c.134 (C.45:19A-1 et seq.), as applicable; and (4)  cybersecurity software, devices, and services. c.     Expenditures shall not be made for: (1)  the purchase of firearms or ammunition; (2)  payments to family members or entities owned or operated by family members; or (3)  home improvements not expressly authorized by subsection b. of this section. d.    Any candidate, candidate committee, joint candidates committee, or legislative leadership committee that authorizes an expenditure to pay for the reasonable costs of security measures authorized pursuant to this section shall retain documentation, including receipts, invoices, and contracts of such expenditures, in accordance with the record retention requirements established by P.L.1973, c.83 (C.19:44A-1 et seq.) and the regulations of the Election Law Enforcement Commission.  Such documents shall be considered public records, except that no plan, design, or schematic that reveals the type or location of the security measures installed shall be publicly disclosed. e.     Any security devices or ongoing services purchased pursuant to this section shall be considered an asset of the campaign and shall be appropriately dissolved once the candidate closes out the candidates campaign or the officeholder is no longer in office. Devices and equipment 1[shall] may1 be sold for cost or other reasonable value. f.     The Election Law Enforcement Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to effectuate the purpose of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.